District of Columbia statutes.
34-405

Existing laws to remain in force.

Except as modified or changed by this subtitle and until modified or changed under its provisions, all charters, statutes, laws, ordinances, and regulations in force on March 4, 1913, shall remain and continue to be in full force and effect until altered, amended, or repealed according to law; provided, that all charters, statutes, acts, and parts of acts, laws, ordinances, and regulations enacted prior to March 4, 1913, inconsistent and repugnant to the provisions of this subtitle, and only so far as inconsistent and repugnant thereto, are hereby repealed.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 996, ch. 150, § 8, par. 101

History

Orders and court proceedings, appeals, see § 34-605.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 43-105.
1973 Ed., § 43-1005.

Prior Codifications